dictsource/en_rules
.group ei
        ei         eI
     _) ei         aI
     c) ei         i:
    _h) ei         aI
     l) eice (st   E
        eich       aIk
        eier (_    aI|3
        eigh       eI
     l) eigh       i:
    sl) eigh       eI
     k) eigh       i:T
     h) eigh (t    aI
        eighth     eItT
        eig (n     eI
        eig (er_   aIg
    _n) ei         i:
        eille (_   'eI
        eilles (_  'eI
        ei (m_     aI
     @) ei (n_     i:
    Cl) ei (n_     aI
        ei (nate   I
     @) ei (ne     i:
     b) eing       i:I2N
        eing (_S3  I2N
        eir        e@
     _) eir        aIr
     w) eir        i@3
     l) ei (s      E
    gn) ei (s      aI
    th) ei (sC     i:I
    _s) eis (m     aIz
        eis (e     aIz
        eister     aIst3
    rf) ei (t      I
     f) ei (te     I         // for 'add e' to 'forfeit' etc.
     h) ei (t_     aI
?!3     ei (ther   aI
        ei (th     i:
        ei (v      i:
        ei (z      i:
    _w) ei         aI        // German
    _w) eigh       eI

.group el
     _) el (A      I#l
     _) electro    %Il,EktroU
     _) elect (rici I#lE2kt
     _) elect (rocu I#lE2kt
     _) elect (rol  I#lE2kt
     _) elect (ron  I#lE2kt
     _) ele (g     ElI
     _) elem       ElIm
     _) ele (p     ElI
     _) el (er     El
    sk) ele (t     ElI#
     _) ele (va    ElI
        el (igi    'El
     _) elit       %Ili:t
     &) el (_      @L
 couns) el (@      @l
     &) el (s_     @L
?8   &) el (_      El
?8   &) el (s_     El
        ela (_     'El@
     _) el (iot    El
        ella (_    'El@
    &C) eller (_   @l3
     t) eller (_+  El3
    &C) eler (_    @l3
     &) ell (_$w_alt2 @L
     @) elli (_    'ElI
     &) elling     @lI2N
     &) eling      @lI2N
     &) ell (ous   @l
     &) el (ous_   @l
   cib) el (_      El
    xc) el (_      'El
  sonn) el (_      'El
     p) el (_      'El
     n) ell (_     'El
    nn) ell (_     @L
    &r) ell (_     @L
        elle (_    'El
  dopp) el         @L
   all) el         El
   all) el (o      'El
     _) elo (ng    i:l,0
     v) elop       'El@p
        elo (q     El@
     d) el (iv     @l
     f) el (ix     i:l
     s) el (ect    I#l
     _) ell (ip    %Il
     v) el (oc     @l
     t) el (p      @L
     &) el (ry_    @L
     _) else       Els
     j) elly       ElI
     &) el (ty_    @L


.group em
     _) em (@      %e#m
     _) em (a      I2m
     &) em (a_     @m
     &) em (_      @m
     _) em (ac     i:m
        em (ail    i:m
     f) em (ale    i:m
     @) em (ber    'Em
        em (ana    Em
        emba (s    Emb@
        em (blem   Em
     _) em (broc   Em
        em (bry    Em
        em (eral   Em
     _) em (e      I2m
        em (ery    Em
    _)  em (i      Em
        em (issi   I2m
     _) em (it     I2m
    _)  emm        Em
        emm (an    I2m
     _) em (o      I2m
        em (path   Em
        em (per    Em
        em (phas   Em
    @t) em (pla    @m
        em (pres   Em
        em (pti    Em
        em (pty    Em
        em (ul     Em
        em (uls    I2m
     h) em (o      i:m
     h) emorrh     Em@r
   sph) em         @m
   sph) em (e      'i:m
    _s) ema (nti   @ma
     &) em (y_     @m
   yst) em         @m
   yst) em (i      Em

.group en
     _) en (@      %e#n
        en (_$w_alt1 En
     &) eness (_S4 n@s
    &r) en (@      En
    Ah) en         En
     &) en (si     En
 chick) en         In
        en (a_     'i:n
        en (al_    i:n
        en (ary    'i:n
  merc) en         @n
     _) ena (m     I2na
     &) en (Ance   @n
     &) en (ch     En
     _) encha (n   %e#ntSaa
        enclav     EnkleIv
        en (core   0n
     &) ency (_    @ns%i
        ency (cli  %EnsI
     _) en (dg@    %En
     _) en (dp@    %En
     k) en (d_     En
     s) en (d_     En
     t) en (d_     En
        en (dA_    'En
     _) en (da     %En
    eg) en (d      @n
        en (der    En
   cal) en (dAr    @n
        en (dous   En
     _) endo       EndoU
     @) en (do_    'En
        endow      End'aU
     _) endor      %Endo@
        endron (_  'Endr@n
     _) en (du     %En
     _) en (e      En
    _g) enea       i:nI'a
     t) enem       En@m
        en (eous_  i:n
     _) ener       En3
     g) ener (i    @nEr
  @@th) enes (_    =@ni:z
     _) en (gel    En
     g) en (etic   I2n
     &) en (ger    In
        eng (lA    INg
        engin      EndZIn
        eng (_     'EN       // place names
        enging     EndZIN
        en (ig     En
        en (igma_  %En
     &) enine      @ni:n
     &) enko (_    'EnkoU
        enli (v    %EnlaI
     _) en (m      En
     &) en (ment   @n
        en (mes    %En
     _) enn        %En
        enne (_    'En
        enn (ia    'En
     _) en (o      I2n
     _) en (oX     i:n
  carp) en         @n
        enrage     %EnreIdZ
        enrol      %EnroUl
     @) enous (_   =@n@s
   ost) en (s      'En
        en (sig    En
        en (sk_    'En
        en (CCL03_ 'En
        enshrine   %EnSraIn
     m) entary (_  'Ent@r%i
        en (tative 'En
     @) en (tL03_  'En
        en (ter    En
        en (tert   ,En
        enthra (l  %EnTrO:
        en (tia_+  'En
     &) entice     %EntaIs
     _) en (ti     %En
    _c) enti       EntI
        en (tity   En
        en (tran   En
        en (trec   0n
        en (trep   ,0n
     c) enter      E2nt3
     c) en (tre    E2n
        en (tri    En
        en (tro    En
     _) en (try    En
     _) en (u      I2n
     @) en (tu     'En
     @) en (tous   'En
     m) enu        Enju:
        en (viA    En
        enviro     %EnvaIr@
        en (voy    En
        en (vy     En
        en (zy     En
     &) en (_      @n
   %CC) en (_      En
     &) en (ed_    @n
        ene (_     i:n
     &) en (er_    @n
    sc) en (e      i:n
     g) en (iA     i:n
    _s) en (i      i:n
        en (ia     'i:n
  mill) en (ia     'En
     l) eni (e     i:nI
     v) eni (e     i:nI
        en (sia    En
        en (tsi    En
     &) en (t_     @n
?8   &) en (t_     En
     @) en (tal    'En
        en (ti     En
        en (tial+  'En
  perc) en (t      En
 _desc) en (t      En
   asc) en (t      En
    ns) en (t      En
    ss) en (t      'En
  _res) en (t      En
 epres) en (t      'En
    nt) en (t      En
    xt) en (t      En
     v) en (t_     En
  L01v) en (t_     @n
   @@v) en (t_     @n
     &) en (th_    @n
     &) en (ty_    @n
     &) en (ce_    @n
?8   &) en (ce_    En
     f) en (ce_    En
     _) en (ough   I2n
     b) en (z      E2n

.group eo
     _) eo         i:0
     X) eo (_+     i:oU
     f) eo         i:
    @@) eo (_      'eIoU
     g) eo         I20
    _g) eo (gr     I0
    _g) eo (log    I0
    _g) eo         ,i:%oU
    _g) eor (C     O@
        eoa (_     i@
        eo (d_     aU
     g) eo (ff     E
     g) eon        @n
    ch) eon        @n
     j) eo (p      E
    _l) eo         i@
     l) eopard     Ep3d
    _p) eo (n      i@
     p) eo (pl     i:
     _) eor        eI3
     @) eosis      i:'oUsIs
     &) eous (_    =i@s
        eover      oUv@
        eos (_     I2oUz
        eoes (_    I2oUz

.group er
     &) er         3
   @@@) er (_S2de  3         // suffix
   @ed) er (_S2d   3         // suffix, adjective
   ied) er (_S2de  3         // suffix
    %C) er (_S3    3
    mm) er (_      3
    rn) er (_S2    3
    er) er (_S2    3
    ll) er (_S2    %3
     &) er (_      %3
?11  &) er (_      a#        // (temporary because [3] -> [a#] is only for word-final
                              // ?11 not ?8: GB-only non-rhotic weak vowel; en-in stays rhotic via the %3 default above
    ll) ers (_S3   %3z
?11 %C) ers (_S4   a#z
    ss) er (_S2    3
   all) er (_      3
    mb) er (_      3
   &en) er (_S2    3
   lin) er (_S1    3
    nc) er (_S1    3
        er         3:
        er (A      3:r
     _) er (A      I2r
     _) er         3:
     _) err (A     Er
     @) eral (ity  @r'al
     &) eram (ent  r@m
     X) era (_     i@r@
   cam) era        @-r@
    XC) err        Er
        erred (_   '3:d
        errer (_   '3:r3
        er (_      3:
        er (B_     3:
    _c) ere (br    3ri:
    _c) ere (braC  ErI
     &) ere (_     3
        ere (_     3:
    _s) er (en     Er
     &) er (s_     3
?3   b) erry (_    Er%i
     g) eral (d    Er@L
     g) er (iat    Er
        er (bial   '3:
?!3 _d) er (b      A@
     &) er (A      3r
     @) er (o_     'e@r
   num) er (o_     @
   osp) er (o_     %3r
        eri (A     'i@3r%i
        eria (_$w_alt1 @r'i@
        er (iC     Er
     &) er (ing    3r
        er (ie_   =3r
        er (ie     3r
        eries (_S2i z
     &) er (ous    =@r
     m) er (c      3:
     p) er (cen    3
   exp) eri (en    i@rI2
    XC) er         3:
    th) er (@      3:
     h) er (nan    %3
     X) er (A      E#r
    _h) eretical   I#rEtIk@L
   _qu) er         3:
     c) er (am     I#r
     &) ere (_     3
    XC) ere (_     i@3
   sph) ere (_     i@3
     c) ere (_     'i@3
     d) ere (_     i@3
     i) ere (_     I2e@
     m) ere (_     i@3
    ev) ere (_     i@3
    mp) ere (_     e@
    _h) ere        i@3
     h) ere (di    @rE
    _h) ere (s     Er@
    _h) ere (t     Er@
    ef) er (enX    r
    ef) er (ence_  r
  diff) er (enX    r
  diff) er (ence_  r
   adh) er (e      'i@3
   coh) er (e      'i@3
    _h) er (ed     I2r
     c) ere (mon   ErI#
    st) ereo       ErI2oU
     m) er (ge     '3:
        erging     '3:dZI2N
     v) er (ge     '3:
        er (gic_   '3:
        er (ic_    'Er
        er (ical   'Er
     p) er (force  %3
     p) er (hap    %3
    _p) erio (d    i@rI2@
    _p) erio (dic  i@rI2'0
        ereal      'i@rI2@L
     @) er (ity    'Er
     &) erise (_   =@raIz
     &) erize (_   =@raIz
     &) eris (a    @raIz
     &) eriz (a    @raIz
     @) er (Cal_   '3:
     @) er (Cic_   '3:
 weath) erman (_   3man
     p) ermea (b   3:mi@
    _f) erme (nt   %3:mE
        er (nal_   '3:
     &) er (n_     3
     c) er (n_     3:
     z) er (o_     i@3
    _g) er (on     Er
     &) er (oCe_   =@r
    _t) erre (_    e@
     h) err (y_    Er
        er (se     3:
     v) er (sal    '3:
     @) ersi (al   '3:S
     @) er (sy     3:
        er (sib    3:
        er (sif    3:
        er (sion   '3:
        er (siv    3:
     &) er (t_     3
  conc) er (t_     3:
        er (tion   3:
?!3  h) er (tf     A@
     h) er (tz     3:
     c) er (t      3:
   asc) er (t      3
     v) er (t      3:
    @v) er (t_     3:
     h) erto (_    3tu:
     _) er (ud     Er
        er (ve     3:
     s) er (van    3:
     &) ery (_     @r%i
 @@ell) ery (_     ri
?3      ery (_++$w_alt2 @ri
?3 @@AC) ery (_     ,e@ri
        ery (A     3j
    qu) ery        i@rI
    _x) er (o      i@r
    _z) er (o+     i@r
    _C) er (o_     i@r
        er (rA     E
        err (_N    e@
